Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,128
Patient record system; requirements.

Each health maintenance organization shall ensure the use and maintenance of an adequate patient record system which facilitates documentation and retrieval of clinical information for the purpose of the health maintenance organization evaluating continuity and coordination of patient care and assessing the quality of health and medical care provided to enrollees. Enrollee clinical records shall be available to the Department of Health and Human Services or an authorized designee for examination and review to ascertain compliance with section 44-32,127 or as deemed necessary by the department.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 248;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 187.